District of Columbia statutes.
7-1651.03

Department of Health certification.

Within 30 days of the implementation of the HPV vaccination program, the Director of the Department of Health shall provide written certification to the Council that the vaccine is safe and efficacious.

July 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-10, § 4, 54 DCR 5146

History